RBMT/apertium_HOWTO/apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vblex"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
   <sdef n="prn"/>
   <sdef n="subj"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>

	<pardef n="gramophone__n">
	   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="dictionar/y__n">
	   <e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ies</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ees</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
	   <e><p><l>I</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>you</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>it</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>we</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>you</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>they</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="gramophone"><i>gramophone</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="record player"><i>record<b/>player</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="dictionary"><i>dictionar</i><par n="dictionar/y__n"/></e>
	<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
</section>

</dictionary>
